Colorado, session 2026A, HB1084.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-40-106, amend (3)(e)
as follows:
1-40-106. Title board - meetings - ballot title - initiative and
referendum - definitions - rules.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(3) (e) For measures that reduce state tax revenue through a tax
change, the ballot title must begin "Shall there be a reduction to the
(description of tax) by (the percentage by which the tax is reduced in the
first full fiscal year that the measure reduces revenue) thereby reducing state
revenue, which will LIKELY reduce funding for state expenditures that
include but are not limited to (the three largest areas of program
expenditure) by an estimated (projected dollar figure of revenue reduction
to the state in the first full fiscal year that the measure reduces revenue) in
tax revenue...?". If the ballot measure specifies the public services or
programs that are to be reduced by the tax change, those public services or
programs must be stated in the ballot title. If the public services or programs
identified in the measure are insufficient to account for the full dollar value
of the tax change in the first full fiscal year that the measure reduces
revenue, then the three largest areas of program expenditure must be stated
in the bill title along with the public services or programs identified in the
measure. The estimates reflected in the ballot title shall not be interpreted
as restrictions of the state's budgeting process.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-40-124.5, amend
(1)(b) introductory portion, (1)(b)(III)(L), and (1)(b)(IV); and add
(1)(b)(V), (1)(b)(VI), and (1)(f) as follows:
1-40-124.5. Ballot information booklet.
(1) (b) The director of research of the legislative council of the
general assembly shall prepare a fiscal impact statement for every initiated
or referred measure, taking into consideration fiscal impact information
submitted by the office of state planning and budgeting, the department of
local affairs or any other state agency, and any proponent or other interested
person. The fiscal impact statement prepared for every measure shall MUST
be substantially similar in form and content to the fiscal notes provided by
the legislative council of the general assembly for legislative measures
pursuant to section 2-2-322. A complete copy of the fiscal impact statement
for such THE measure shall MUST be available through the legislative
council of the general assembly. The ballot information booklet shall MUST
indicate whether there is a fiscal impact for each initiated or referred
measure and shall MUST abstract the fiscal impact statement for such THE
measure. The abstract for every measure shall MUST appear after the
arguments for and against such THE measure in the analysis section of the
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1084

ballot information booklet and shall MUST include, but shall IS not be
limited to:
(III) For any initiated or referred measure that modifies the state tax
laws, if the measure would either increase or decrease individual income tax
revenue or state sales tax revenue, a table that shows the number of tax
filers in each income category, the total change in the amount of tax owed
for each income category, and the average change in the amount of tax
owed for each filer within each income category. If the change in the
amount of tax owed shown in the table is an increase, the change must be
expressed as a dollar amount preceded by a plus sign. If the change in the
amount of tax owed shown in the table is a decrease, the change must be
expressed as a dollar amount preceded by a negative sign. The table must
use the following income categories:
(L) Federal adjusted gross income greater than or equal to one
million dollars; and
(IV) If the measure contains a proposed tax change, as defined in
section 1-40-106 (3)(i)(II), that reduces state tax revenue, a description of
the MEASURE'S LIKELY EFFECT ON THE three largest areas of program
expenditure, as defined in section 1-40-106 (3)(i)(I);
(V) FOR AN INITIATED MEASURE THAT WILL RESULT IN INCREASED
STATE EXPENDITURES, EXCEPT FOR DE MINIMIS AND ADMINISTRATIVE
EXPENDITURES, AND THAT DOES NOT IDENTIFY AND PROVIDE FOR A
SUFFICIENT SOURCE OF REVENUE OR SUFFICIENT REDUCTIONS IN STATE
SPENDING TO ACCOUNT FOR THE INCREASED EXPENDITURES, A DESCRIPTION
OF THE MEASURE'S LIKELY EFFECT ON THE THREE LARGEST AREAS OF
PROGRAM EXPENDITURE, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 1-40-106 (3)(i)(I); AND
(VI) FOR AN INITIATED MEASURE THAT REQUIRES EXISTING REVENUE
SOURCES TO BE REALLOCATED AND SPENT IN A PARTICULAR WAY, A
DESCRIPTION OF THE MEASURE'S LIKELY EFFECT ON THE THREE LARGEST
AREAS OF PROGRAM EXPENDITURE, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 1-40-106
(3)(i)(I).
(f) WHEN PREPARING THE FISCAL IMPACT STATEMENT REQUIRED BY
THIS SUBSECTION (1), THE DIRECTOR OF RESEARCH OF THE LEGISLATIVE
COUNCIL OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY SHALL INCLUDE THE INFORMATION
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1084

REQUIRED IN THE ABSTRACT AS SET FORTH IN SUBSECTIONS (1)(b)(V) AND
(1)(b)(VI) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1084